vim/spell/en.aff
SET UTF-8

# Suffixes extracted from en_US.aff in
# https://extensions.openoffice.org/en/project/english-dictionaries-apache-openoffice
# and simplified.

# For a verb:
SFX V Y 10
# -ed regular past tense
SFX V   0     d          e
SFX V   y     ied        [^aeiou]y
SFX V   0     ed         [^ey]
SFX V   0     ed         [aeiou]y
# -ing form
SFX V   e     ing        e
SFX V   0     ing        [^e]
# -s conjugation
SFX V   y     ies        [^aeiou]y
SFX V   0     s          [aeiou]y
SFX V   0     es         [sxzh]
SFX V   0     s          [^sxzhy]

# -ion for a verb
SFX T Y 6
SFX T   e     ion        e
SFX T   y     ication    y
SFX T   0     en         [^ey]

SFX T   e     ions       e
SFX T   y     ications   y
SFX T   0     ens        [^ey]

# For a noun:
SFX N Y 5
# -s plurals
SFX N   y     ies        [^aeiou]y
SFX N   0     s          [aeiou]y
SFX N   0     es         [sxzh]
SFX N   0     s          [^sxzhy]
# -'s possessive
SFX N   0     's         .
